North Carolina statutes. Chapter 62. Public Utilities.
Article 7. Rates of Public Utilities.
§ 62-133.16.
Performance-based regulation authorized.

Definitions. — For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

“Cost causation principle” means establishment of a causal link between a specific customer class, how that class uses the electric system, and costs incurred by the electric public utility for the provision of electric service.

“Decoupling rate-making mechanism” means a rate-making mechanism intended to break the link between an electric public utility’s revenue and the level of consumption of electricity on a per customer basis by its residential customers.

“Distributed energy resource” or “DER” means a device or measure that produces electricity or reduces electricity consumption and is connected to the electric distribution system, either on the customer’s premises or on the electric public utility’s primary distribution system. A DER may include any of the following: energy efficiency, distributed generation, demand response, microgrids, energy storage, energy management systems, and electric vehicles.

“Earnings sharing mechanism” means an annual rate-making mechanism that shares surplus earnings between the electric public utility and customers over the period of time covered by a MYRP.

“Multiyear rate plan” or “MYRP” means a rate-making mechanism under which the Commission sets base rates for a multiyear period that includes authorized periodic changes in base rates without the need for the electric public utility to file a subsequent general rate application pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

, along with an earnings sharing mechanism.

“Performance incentive mechanism” or “PIM” means a rate-making mechanism that links electric public utility revenue or earnings to electric public utility performance in targeted areas consistent with policy goals, as that term is defined by this section, approved by the Commission, and includes specific performance metrics and targets against which electric public utility performance is measured.

“Performance-based regulation” or “PBR” means an alternative rate-making approach that includes decoupling, one or more performance incentive mechanisms, and a multiyear rate plan, including an earnings sharing mechanism, or such other alternative regulatory mechanisms as may be proposed by an electric public utility.

“Policy goal” means the expected or anticipated achievement of operational efficiency, cost-savings, or reliability of electric service that is greater than that which already is required by State or federal law or regulation, including standards the Commission has established by order prior to and independent of a PBR application, provided that, with respect to environmental standards, the Commission may not approve a policy goal that is more stringent than is established by (i) State law, (ii) federal law, (iii) the Environmental Management Commission pursuant to G.S. 143B-282, or (iv) the United States Environmental Protection Agency.

“Rate year” means the year of the MYRP for which base rates are effective.

“Tracking metric” means a methodology for tracking and quantitatively measuring and monitoring outcomes or electric public utility performance.

Performance-Based Regulation Authorized. — In addition to the method for fixing base rates established under

G.S. 62-133

, the Commission is authorized to approve performance-based regulation upon application of an electric public utility pursuant to the process and requirements of this section, so long as the Commission allocates the electric public utility’s total revenue requirement among customer classes based upon the cost causation principle, including the use of minimum system methodology by an electric public utility for the purpose of allocating distribution costs between customer classes, and interclass subsidization of ratepayers is minimized to the greatest extent practicable by the conclusion of the MYRP period. This section shall not be construed to require the Commission to use the minimum system methodology for the purpose of classifying costs within a customer class when setting a basic facilities charge.

Application. — An electric public utility shall be permitted to submit a PBR application in a general rate case proceeding initiated pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

. A PBR application shall include a decoupling rate-making mechanism, one or more PIMs, and a MYRP, including both an earnings sharing mechanism and proposed revenue requirements and base rates for each of the years that a MYRP is in effect or a method for calculating the same. The PBR application may also include proposed tracking metrics with or without targets or benchmarks to measure electric public utility achievement. The following additional requirements apply to a PBR application:

The following shall apply to a MYRP:

The base rates for the first rate year of a MYRP shall be fixed in the manner prescribed under

G.S. 62-133

, including actual changes in costs, revenues, or the cost of the electric public utility’s property used and useful, or to be used and useful within a reasonable time after the test period, plus costs associated with a known and measurable set of capital investments, net of operating benefits, associated with a set of discrete and identifiable capital spending projects to be placed in service during the first rate year. Subsequent changes in base rates in the second and third rate years of the MYRP shall be based on projected incremental Commission-authorized capital investments that will be used and useful during the rate year and associated expenses, net of operating benefits, including operation and maintenance savings, and depreciation of rate base associated with the capital investments, that are incurred or realized during each rate year of the MYRP period; provided that the amount of increase in the second rate year under the MYRP shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the electric public utility’s North Carolina retail jurisdictional revenue requirement that is used to fix rates during the first year of the MYRP pursuant to G.S. 62-133 excluding any revenue requirement for the capital spending projects to be placed in service during the first rate year. The amount of increase for the third rate year under the MYRP shall not exceed four percent (4%) of the electric public utility’s North Carolina retail jurisdictional revenue requirement that is used to fix rates during the first year of the MYRP pursuant to G.S. 62-133, excluding any revenue requirement for the capital spending projects placed in service during the first rate year. The revenue requirements associated with any single new generation plant placed in service during the MYRP for which the total plant in service balance exceeds five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) shall not be included in a MYRP. Instead, the utility may request and the Commission may grant, if it deems appropriate, permission to establish a regulatory asset and defer to such regulatory asset incremental costs related to such electric generation investments to be considered for recovery in a future rate proceeding. In setting the electric public utility’s authorized rate of return on equity for an MYRP period, the Commission shall consider any increased or decreased risk to either the electric public utility or its ratepayers that may result from having an approved MYRP.

In a proceeding authorizing a MYRP, the Commission shall establish a rider to refund amounts related to the earnings sharing mechanism, and to refund or collect amounts related to PIM rewards or penalties, and decoupling adjustments.

Within 60 days of the conclusion of each rate year, the Commission shall establish a proceeding to:

Examine the earnings of the electric public utility during the rate year to determine if the earnings exceeded the authorized rate of return on equity determined by the Commission in the proceeding establishing the PBR. If the weather-normalized earnings exceed the authorized rate of return on equity plus 50 basis points, the excess earnings above the authorized rate of return on equity plus 50 basis points shall be refunded to customers in the rider established by the Commission. If the weather-normalized earnings fall below the authorized rate of return on equity, the electric public utility may file a rate case pursuant to G.S. 62-133. Any penalties or rewards from PIM incentives and any incentives related to demand-side management and energy efficiency measures pursuant to G.S. 62-133.9(f) will be excluded from the determination of any refund pursuant to earnings sharing mechanism.

Evaluate the performance of the electric public utility with respect to Commission approved PIMs applicable in the rate year. Any financial rewards shall be collected from customers and any penalties refunded to customers, in each case, through the rider established by the Commission.

Evaluate the decoupling rate-making mechanism, and refund or collect, as applicable, a corresponding amount from residential customers through the rider established by the Commission.

The proposed decoupling mechanism shall only be applied to residential customer classes. The Commission shall establish an annual revenue requirement per residential customer and an appropriate distribution of said revenue requirement per customer in each month of the year. The established monthly revenue requirements times the actual number of residential customers each month shall become the target revenue for the residential class. Each month, the electric public utility shall defer to a regulatory asset or liability account the difference between the actual revenue and the target revenue for the residential class. The changes in revenue requirements for the second and third rate years shall be allocated to the residential customer class and divided by the number of residential customers to determine the appropriate adjustment to the annual revenue requirement per residential customer that is used to establish the target revenues for the residential class in the second and third rate years of a MYRP. The electric public utility may exclude rate schedules or riders for electric vehicle charging, including EV charging during off-peak periods on time-of-use rates, from the decoupling mechanism to preserve the electric public utility’s incentive to encourage electric vehicle adoption.

The policy goal targeted by a PIM shall be clearly defined, measurable with a defined performance metric, and solely or primarily within the electric public utility’s control.

Any PIM shall be structured to ensure that, pursuant to subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, any penalty shall be refunded to customers and any reward shall be collected from customers and shall be limited such that the total of all potential and actual PIM incentives or penalties does not exceed one percent (1%) of the electric public utility’s total annual revenue requirement that is used to fix rates during the first year of the MYRP pursuant to G.S. 62-133, excluding any revenue requirement for the capital spending projects to be placed in service during the first rate year, where the PIM is approved. Any incentives related to demand-side management and energy efficiency measures pursuant to G.S. 62-133.9(f) shall be excluded from the limits established in this section and shall continue to be recovered through the demand-side management and energy efficiency (DSM/EE) rider.

Subject to the limitations set out in subdivision (4) of this subsection, any PIMs proposed by an electric public utility shall include one or more of the following:

Rewards based on the sharing of savings achieved by meeting or exceeding a specific policy goal.

Rewards or penalties based on differentiated authorized rates of return on common equity to encourage utility investments or operational changes to meet a specific policy goal, which shall not be greater than 25 basis points.

Fixed financial rewards to encourage achievement of specific policy goals, or fixed financial penalties for failure to achieve policy goals.

Commission Action on Application. —

The Commission shall approve a PBR application by an electric public utility only upon a finding that a proposed PBR would result in just and reasonable rates, is in the public interest, and is consistent with the criteria established in this section and rules adopted thereunder. In reviewing any such PBR application under this section, the Commission shall consider whether the PBR application:

Assures that no customer or class of customers is unreasonably harmed and that the rates are fair both to the electric public utility and to the customer.

Reasonably assures the continuation of safe and reliable electric service.

Will not unreasonably prejudice any class of electric customers and result in sudden substantial rate increases or “rate shock” to customers.

In reviewing any such PBR application under this section, the Commission may consider whether the PBR application:

Encourages peak load reduction or efficient use of the system.

Encourages utility-scale renewable energy and storage.

Encourages DERs.

Reduces low-income energy burdens.

Encourages energy efficiency.

Encourages carbon reductions.

Encourages beneficial electrification, including electric vehicles.

Supports equity in contracting.

Promotes resilience and security of the electric grid.

Maintains adequate levels of reliability and customer service.

Promotes rate designs that yield peak load reduction or beneficial load-shaping.

When an electric public utility files with the Commission an application for a general rate case pursuant to

G.S. 62-133

and that application includes a PBR application, the Commission shall institute proceedings on the application as provided in this subdivision. The electric public utility shall not make any changes in any rate or implement a PBR except upon 30 days’ notice to the Commission, and the Commission may require the electric public utility to provide notice of the pending PBR application to the same extent as provided in G.S. 62-134(a) and may suspend the effect of the proposed base rates and PBR implementation pending investigation in the same manner as provided in G.S. 62-134(b), provided that, the Commission may suspend the implementation of the proposed base rates for no longer than 300 days. The electric public utility’s application shall plainly state the changes in base rates and the time when the change in rates will go into effect and shall include schedules in the same manner required pursuant to G.S. 62-134(a). The Commission shall, upon reasonable notice, conduct a hearing concerning the lawfulness of the proposed base rates and the PBR application. After hearing, the Commission shall issue an order approving, modifying, or rejecting the electric public utility’s PBR application. In the event that the Commission rejects a PBR application, the Commission shall nevertheless establish the electric public utility’s base rates in accordance with

G.S. 62-133

based on the PBR application. If the Commission rejects the PBR application, it shall provide an explanation of the deficiency and an opportunity for the electric public utility to refile, or for the electric public utility and the stakeholders to collaborate to cure the identified deficiency and refile.

Commission Review. — At any time prior to expiration of a PBR plan period, the Commission, with good cause and upon its own motion or petition by the Public Staff, may examine the reasonableness of an electric public utility’s rates under a plan, conduct periodic reviews with opportunities for public hearings and comments from interested parties, and initiate a proceeding to adjust base rates or PIMs as necessary. In addition, the approval of a PBR shall not be construed to limit the Commission’s authority to grant additional deferrals between rate cases for extraordinary costs not otherwise recognized in rates.

Plan Period. — Any PBR application approved pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for a plan period of not more than 36 months.

Commission Authority Preserved. — Nothing in this section shall be construed to (i) limit or abrogate the existing rate-making authority of the Commission or (ii) invalidate or void any rates approved by the Commission prior to the effective date of this section. In all respects, the alternative rate-making mechanisms, designs, plans, or settlements shall operate independently, and be considered separately, from riders or other cost recovery mechanisms otherwise allowed by law, unless otherwise incorporated into such plan.

Utility Reporting. — For purposes of measuring an electric public utility’s earnings under a PBR application approved under this section, an electric public utility shall make an annual filing that sets forth the electric public utility’s earned return on equity, the electric public utility’s revenue requirement trued-up with the actual electric public utility revenue, the amount of revenue adjustment in terms of customer refund or surcharge, if applicable, and the adjustments reflecting rewards or penalties provided for in PIMs approved by the Commission.

Commission Report. — No later than April 1 of each year, the Commission shall submit a report on the activities taken by the Commission to implement, and by electric public utilities to comply with, the requirements of this section to the Governor, the Environmental Review Commission, the Joint Legislative Commission on Energy Policy, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, the chairs of the Senate Appropriations Committee on Agriculture, Natural, and Economic Resources, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and the chairs of the House Committee on Energy and Public Utilities. The report shall include a summary of public comments received by the Commission. In developing the report, the Commission shall consult with the Department of Environmental Quality.

Rulemaking. — The Commission shall adopt rules to implement the requirements of this section. Rules adopted shall include all of the following matters:

The specific procedures and requirements that an electric public utility shall meet when requesting approval of a PBR application.

The criteria for evaluating a PBR application.

The parameters for a technical conference process to be conducted by the Commission prior to submission of any PBR application consisting of one or more public meetings at which the electric public utility presents information regarding projected transmission and distribution expenditures and interested parties are permitted to provide comment and feedback; provided, however, no cross-examination of parties shall be permitted. The technical conference process to be established shall not exceed a duration of 60 days from the date on which the electric public utility requests initiation of such process.

In the event the Commission rejects a PBR application, the process by which an electric public utility may address the Commission’s reasons for rejection of a PBR application, which process may include collaboration between stakeholders and the electric public utility to cure any identified deficiency in an electric public utility’s PBR application.

History.

2021-165, s. 4(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-165, s. 4(c), made this section effective October 13, 2021, and applicable to any rate-making mechanisms filed by an electric public utility on or after the date that rules adopted pursuant to

G.S. 62-133.16

become effective.

Session Laws
2021-165, s. 4(b), provides: “The Commission shall adopt rules as required by G.S. 62-133.16(j), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section, no later than 120 days after the date this section becomes law [October 13, 2021].”

Session Laws 2021-165, s. 7, is a severability clause.

§§ 62-133.17 through 62-133.19.
[Reserved]

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 62-133.20.
Cleanfields renewable energy demonstration parks.

Criteria for Designation. — A parcel or tract of land, or any combination of contiguous parcels or tracts of land, that meet all of the following criteria may be designated as a cleanfields renewable energy demonstration park:

The park consists of at least 250 acres of contiguous property.

All of the real property comprising the park is contiguous to a body of water.

The property within the park is or may be subject to remediation under the Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended (42 U.S.C. § 9601, et seq.), except for a site listed on the National Priorities List pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 9605.

The park contains a manufacturing facility that is idle, underutilized, or curtailed and that at one time employed at least 250 people.

The owners of the park plan to attract at least 250 new jobs to the site.

The owners of the park have entered into a brownfields agreement with the Department of Environment and Natural Resources pursuant to

G.S. 130A-310.32

and have provided satisfactory financial assurance for the brownfields agreement.

The creation of the park is for the purpose of featuring clean-energy facilities, laboratories, and companies, thereby spurring economic growth by attracting renewable energy and alternative fuel industries.

The development plan for the park must include at least three renewable energy or alternative fuel facilities.

The development plan for the park must include a biomass renewable energy facility that utilizes refuse derived fuel, including yard waste, wood waste, and waste generated from construction and demolition, but not including wood directly derived from whole trees, as the primary source for generating energy. The refuse derived fuel shall undergo an enhanced recycling process before being utilized by the biomass renewable energy facility.

The initial biomass renewable energy facility will not be a major source, as that term is defined in 40 C.F.R. § 70.2 (July 1, 2009 edition), for air quality purposes. The biomass renewable energy facility will remain in compliance with all applicable State and federal emissions requirements throughout its operating life.

Certification. — The owner of a parcel or tract of land that seeks to establish a cleanfields renewable energy demonstration park shall submit to the Secretary of State an application for designation. The Secretary shall examine the application and may request any additional information from the owner of the parcel or tract of land or the Department of Environment and Natural Resources needed to verify that the project meets all of the criteria for designation. The Secretary may rely on certifications provided by the owner or the Department of Environment and Natural Resources that the criteria are met. If the Secretary determines that the project meets all of the criteria, the Secretary shall make and issue a certificate designating the parcel or tract of land as a cleanfields renewable energy demonstration park to the owner and shall file and record the application and certificate in an appropriate book of record. The parcel or tract of land shall be designated as a cleanfields renewable energy demonstration park on the date the certificate is filed and recorded.

Renewable Energy Generation. — The definitions in

G.S. 62-133.8

apply to this section. If the Utilities Commission determines that a biomass renewable energy facility located in the cleanfields renewable energy demonstration park is a new renewable energy facility, the Commission shall assign triple credit to any electric power or renewable energy certificates generated from renewable energy resources at the biomass renewable energy facility that are purchased by an electric power supplier for the purposes of compliance with

G.S. 62-133.8

. The additional credits assigned to the first 10 megawatts of biomass renewable energy facility generation capacity shall be eligible for use to meet the requirements of G.S. 62-133.8(f). The additional credits assigned to the first 10 megawatts of biomass renewable energy facility generation capacity shall first be used to satisfy the requirements of G.S. 62-133.8(f). Only when the requirements of G.S. 62-133.8(f) are met, shall the additional credits assigned to the first 10 megawatts of biomass renewable energy facility generation capacity be utilized to comply with G.S. 62-133.8(b) and (c). The triple credit shall apply only to the first 20 megawatts of biomass renewable energy facility generation capacity located in all cleanfields renewable energy demonstration parks in the State.

History.

2010-195, ss. 2-4; 2011-279, s. 1.

§ 62-134.
Change of rates; notice; suspension and investigation.

Unless the Commission otherwise orders, no public utility shall make any changes in any rate which has been duly established under this Chapter, except after 30 days’ notice to the Commission, which notice shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the rates then in force, and the time when the changed rates will go into effect. The public utility shall also give such notice, which may include notice by publication, of the proposed changes to other interested persons as the Commission in its discretion may direct. All proposed changes shall be shown by filing new schedules, or shall be plainly indicated upon schedules filed and in force at the time and kept open to public inspection. The Commission, for good cause shown in writing, may allow changes in rates without requiring the 30 days’ notice, under such conditions as it may prescribe. All such changes shall be immediately indicated upon its schedules by such public utility.

Whenever there is filed with the Commission by any public utility any schedule stating a new or revised rate or rates, the Commission may, either upon complaint or upon its own initiative, upon reasonable notice, enter upon a hearing concerning the lawfulness of such rate or rates. Pending such hearing and the decision thereon, the Commission, upon filing with such schedule and delivering to the public utility affected thereby a statement in writing of its reasons therefor, may, at any time before they become effective, suspend the operation of such rate or rates, but not for a longer period than 270 days beyond the time when such rate or rates would otherwise go into effect. If the proceeding has not been concluded and an order made within the period of suspension, the proposed change of rate shall go into effect at the end of such period. After hearing, whether completed before or after the rate goes into effect, the Commission may make such order with respect thereto as would be proper in a proceeding instituted after it had become effective.

At any hearing involving a rate changed or sought to be changed by the public utility, the burden of proof shall be upon the public utility to show that the changed rate is just and reasonable.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this Article, any public utility engaged solely in distributing electricity to retail customers, which electricity has been purchased at wholesale rates from another public utility, an electric membership corporation or a municipality, may in its discretion, and without the necessity of public hearings as in this section is otherwise provided, elect to adopt the same retail rates to customers charged by the public utility, electric membership corporation or municipality from whom the wholesale power is purchased for the same service, unless the North Carolina Utility Commission finds upon a hearing, either on its own initiative or upon complaint, that the rate of return earned by such utility upon the basis of such rates is unjust and unreasonable. In such a proceeding the burden of proof shall be upon the electrical distribution company.

Repealed by Session Laws 1981 (Regular Session, 1982), c. 1197, s. 2.

The Commission may adopt rules prescribing the information and exhibits required to be filed with any applications, or tariff for an increase in utility rates, including but not limited to all of the evidence or proof through the end of the test period which the utility will rely on at any hearing on such increase, and the Commission may suspend such increase until such data, information or exhibits are filed, in addition to the time provided for suspension of such increase in other provisions of this Chapter.

The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to bus companies or to their rates, fares or tariffs.

Notwithstanding the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the Commission may, in lieu of fixing specific rates or tariffs for competitive services offered by a public utility defined in G.S. 62-3(23)a6, adopt practices and procedures to permit pricing flexibility, detariffing services, or both. In exercising its authority to permit pricing flexibility, detariffing of services, or both, the Commission shall first determine that the service is competitive. After a determination that the service is competitive, the Commission shall consider the following in deciding whether to permit pricing flexibility, detariffing of services, or both:

The extent to which competing telecommunications services are available from alternative providers in the relevant geographic or service market;

The market share, growth in market share, ease of entry, and affiliations of alternative providers;

The size and number of alternative providers and the ability of such alternative providers to make functionally equivalent or substitute services readily available at competitive rates and on competitive terms and conditions;

Whether the exercise of Commission authority produces tangible benefits to consumers that exceed those available by reliance on market forces;

Whether the exercise of Commission authority inhibits the public utility from competing with unregulated providers of functionally equivalent telecommunications services;

Whether the existence of competition tends to prevent abuses, unjust discrimination or excessive charges for the service or facility offered;

Whether the public utility would gain an unfair advantage in its competitive activities; and

Any other relevant factors protecting the public interest.

On motion of any interested party and for good cause shown, the Commission shall hold hearings prior to adopting any pricing flexibility or detariffing of services permitted under this section. The Commission may also revoke a determination made under this section when the Commission determines, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that the public interest requires that the rates and charges for the service be more fully regulated.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 62-140

, the Commission may permit public utilities subject to subsection (h) of this section to offer competitive services to business customers upon agreement between the public utility and the customer provided the services are compensatory and cover the costs of providing the service.

History.

1933, c. 307, s. 7; 1939, c. 365, s. 3; 1941, c. 97; 1945, c. 725; 1947, c. 1008, s. 24; 1949, c. 1132, s. 22; 1959, c. 422; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1971, c. 551; 1973, c. 1444; 1975, c. 243, s. 8; c. 510, c. 867, s. 7; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1197, s. 2; 1985, c. 676, s. 15(3); 1989, c. 112, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to fuel charge adjustments for electric utilities, see

G.S. 62-133.2

.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1977 law on public utility rate regulation, see 56 N.C.L. Rev. 847 (1978).

For survey of 1980 administrative law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1024 (1981).

§ 62-135.
Temporary rates under bond.

Notwithstanding an order of suspension of an increase in rates, any public utility except a common carrier may, subject to the provisions of subsections (b), (c) and (d) hereof, put such suspended rate or rates into effect upon the expiration of six months after the date when such rate or rates would have become effective, if not so suspended, by notifying the Commission and its consumers of its action in making such increase not less than 10 days prior to the day when it shall be placed in effect; provided, however, that utilities engaged in the distribution of utility commodities bought at wholesale by the utility for distribution to consumers may put such suspended rate or rates, to the extent occasioned by changes in the wholesale rate of such utility commodity, into effect at the expiration of 30 days after the date when such rate or rates would become effective if not so suspended; provided that no rate or rates shall be left in effect longer than one year unless the Commission shall have rendered its decision upon the reasonableness thereof within such period. This section to become effective July 1, 1963.

No rate or rates placed in effect pursuant to this section shall result in an increase of more than twenty percent (20%) on any single rate classification of the public utility.

No rate or rates shall be placed in effect pursuant to this section until the public utility has filed with the Commission a bond in a reasonable amount approved by the Commission, with sureties approved by the Commission, or an undertaking approved by the Commission, conditioned upon the refund in a manner to be prescribed by order of the Commission, to the persons entitled thereto of the amount of the excess plus interest from the date that such rates were put into effect, if the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive. The amount of said interest shall be determined pursuant to G.S. 62-130(e).

If the rate or rates so put into effect are finally determined to be excessive, the public utility shall make refund of the excess plus interest to its customers within 30 days after such final determination, and the Commission shall set forth in its final order the terms and conditions for such refund. If such refund is not paid in accordance with such order, any persons entitled to such refund may sue therefor, either jointly or severally, and be entitled to recover, in addition to the amount of the refund, all court costs and reasonable attorney fees for the plaintiff, to be fixed by the court.

History.

1933, c. 307, s. 7; 1959, c. 422; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1981, c. 461, s. 2.

§ 62-136.
Investigation of existing rates; changing unreasonable rates; certain refunds to be distributed to customers.

Whenever the Commission, after a hearing had after reasonable notice upon its own motion or upon complaint of anyone directly interested, finds that the existing rates in effect and collected by any public utility are unjust, unreasonable, insufficient or discriminatory, or in violation of any provision of law, the Commission shall determine the just, reasonable, and sufficient and nondiscriminatory rates to be thereafter observed and in force, and shall fix the same by order.

All municipalities in the State are deemed to be directly interested in the rates and service of public utilities operating in such municipalities, and may institute or participate in proceedings before the Commission involving such rates or service. Any municipality may institute proceedings before the Commission to eliminate unfair and unreasonable discrimination in rates or service by any public utility between such complainant or its inhabitants and any other municipality or its inhabitants, and the Commission shall, upon complaint, after hearing afforded to the public utility affected and to all municipalities affected, have authority to remove such discrimination.

If any refund is made to a distributing company operating as a public utility in North Carolina of charges paid to the company from which the distributing company obtains the energy, service or commodity distributed, the Commission may, in cases where the charges have been included in rates paid by the customers of the distributing company, require said distributing company to distribute said refund plus interest among the distributing company’s customers in a manner prescribed by the Commission. The amount of said interest shall be determined pursuant to G.S. 62-130(e).

History.

Ex. Sess. 1913, c. 20, s. 7; C.S., s. 1083; 1933, c. 134, s. 8; c. 307, s. 8; 1937, c. 401; 1941, c. 97; 1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1981, c. 460, s. 1.

§ 62-137.
Scope of rate case.

In setting a hearing on rates upon its own motion, upon complaint, or upon application of a public utility, the Commission shall declare the scope of the hearing by determining whether it is to be a general rate case, under

G.S. 62-133

, or whether it is to be a case confined to the reasonableness of a specific single rate, a small part of the rate structure, or some classification of users involving questions which do not require a determination of the entire rate structure and overall rate of return. The procedures established in this section shall not be required when pricing alternatives permitted under G.S. 62-134(h) and (j) are adopted.

History.

1963, c. 1165, s. 1; 1989, c. 112, s. 4.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1978 administrative law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 831 (1979).